Nebraska, session 109, LB402.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 9-1302, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1302 The purposes of the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act are to:
(1) Establish and maintain a procedure to set off against an
obligor's casino winnings, parimutuel winnings, sports wagering winnings,
or cash device winnings any debt (a) that is assigned to the Department
of Health and Human Services or that any individual not eligible as a
public assistance recipient is attempting to collect through the Title
IV-D child support enforcement program, (b) that has accrued through
written contract, subrogation, or court judgment, and (c) that is in the
form of a liquidated amount due and owing for the care, support, or
maintenance of a child or for medical or spousal support; and
(2) Establish and maintain a procedure to set off against a
taxpayer's casino winnings, parimutuel winnings, sports wagering
winnings, or cash device winnings the amount of such taxpayer's
outstanding state tax liability as determined by the Department of
Revenue; and .
(3) Establish and maintain a procedure to set off against an
obligor's casino winnings, parimutuel winnings, sports wagering winnings,
or cash device winnings any debt that is assigned to the Department of
Labor for receipt of any sum as benefits under section 48-663.01 to which
the obligor was not entitled under the Employment Security Law.
Sec. 2. Section 9-1303, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1303 For purposes of the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) Applicable winnings means any casino winnings, parimutuel
winnings, sports wagering winnings, or cash device winnings;
(2) Cash device winnings means any cash prize won by a player of a
cash device as defined in section 77-3001 that requires the operator,
-2-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
distributor, or manufacturer of such cash device to provide the player
with an Internal Revenue Service Form 1099;
(3) Casino winnings means any winnings that are required to be
reported on Internal Revenue Service Form W-2G won by a player from a
game of chance at a licensed racetrack enclosure under the jurisdiction
of the State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(4) Claimant means:
(a) The Department of Health and Human Services with respect to
collection of a debt owed by a parent in a case involving a recipient of
aid to dependent children in which rights to child, spousal, or medical
support payments have been assigned to this state;
(b) An individual who is not eligible as a public assistance
recipient and to whom a debt is owed that the individual is attempting to
collect through the Title IV-D child support enforcement program; or
(c) Any person or entity entitled to receive child support, spousal
support, or medical support as defined in section 43-1712.01 pursuant to
an order issued by a court or agency of another state or jurisdiction,
including an agency of another state or jurisdiction to which a person
has assigned his or her right to receive such support. Such a claimant
shall submit certification and documentation to the Department of Health
and Human Services sufficient to satisfy the requirements of section
43-1730; or
(d) The Department of Labor with respect to collection of a debt
owed by an individual in a case involving the receipt of unemployment
insurance benefits under section 48-663.01 to which the individual was
not entitled under the Employment Security Law;
(5) Collection system means the collection system developed and
implemented pursuant to section 9-1304;
(6) Debt means any liquidated amount of arrears that has accrued
through assignment, contract, subrogation, court judgment, or operation
of law, regardless of whether there is an outstanding judgment for such
-3-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
amount, and that is (a) for the care, support, or maintenance of a child
or for medical or spousal support or (b) owed as a result of an
overpayment of benefits under section 48-663.01;
(7) Net winnings payment means the winnings payment amount minus the
debt and outstanding state tax liability balance;
(8) Obligor means any individual (a) owing money to or having a
delinquent account with any claimant that has not been satisfied by court
order, set aside by court order, or discharged in bankruptcy or (b) owing
money on an outstanding state tax liability;
(9) Operator means an authorized gaming operator as defined in
section 9-1103, any corporation or association licensed under sections
2-1201 to 2-1218 and authorized to conduct parimutuel wagering at a
licensed racetrack, and any operator, distributor, or manufacturer of a
cash device licensed under the Mechanical Amusement Device Tax Act;
(10) Outstanding state tax liability means any liability arising
from any tax or fee, including penalties and interest, under any tax
program administered by the Tax Commissioner, Department of Labor, or
Department of Motor Vehicles;
(11) Parimutuel winnings means any winnings that are required to be
reported on Internal Revenue Service Form W-2G and have tax withheld by
the operator and that are won by a player from a parimutuel wager at a
licensed racetrack under the jurisdiction of the State Racing and Gaming
Commission;
(12) Sports wagering winnings means any winnings that are required
to be reported on Internal Revenue Service Form W-2G and have tax
withheld by the operator and that are won by a player from sports
wagering as defined in section 9-1103 on a sports wager authorized by the
State Racing and Gaming Commission;
(13) Spousal support has the same meaning as in section 43-1715; and
(14) Winnings payment means a payout of casino winnings, parimutuel
winnings, sports wagering winnings, or cash device winnings to which an
-4-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
individual is entitled as a result of playing or wagering.
Sec. 3. Section 9-1304, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1304 (1)(a) The Department of Revenue, in consultation with the
Department of Health and Human Services and the Department of Labor,
shall develop and implement a secure, electronic collection system to
carry out the purposes of the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act.
(b) The collection system shall include access to the name of an
obligor, the social security number of an obligor, and any other
information that assists the operator in identifying an obligor. The
collection system shall inform the operator of the total amount owed
without detailing the source of any of the amounts owed.
(2) The Department of Health and Human Services may submit any
certified debt of twenty-five dollars or more to the collection system
except when the validity of the debt is legitimately in dispute. The
submission of debts of past-due support shall be a continuous process
that allows the amount of debt to fluctuate up or down depending on the
actual amount owed.
(3) The Department of Revenue may submit to the collection system
any amount of outstanding state tax liability owed by a taxpayer except
when the validity of the outstanding state tax liability is legitimately
in dispute. The inclusion of outstanding state tax liability in the
amount owed shall be a continuous process that allows the amount owed to
fluctuate up or down depending on the actual amount of outstanding state
tax liability owed.
(4) The Department of Labor may submit any certified debt of twenty-
five dollars or more to the collection system except when the validity of
the debt is legitimately in dispute. The submission of debts owed as a
result of overpayments received under section 48-663.01 shall be a
continuous process that allows the amount of debt to fluctuate up or down
-5-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
depending on the actual amount owed.
(5) (4) If the name of the obligor is retrieved from the collection
system by the operator, the retrieval of such name shall be evidence of a
valid lien upon and claim of lien against any applicable winnings of the
obligor whose name is electronically retrieved from the collection
system. If an obligor's applicable winnings are required to be set off
pursuant to the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act, the
full amount of the debt and outstanding state tax liability shall be
collected from any applicable winnings due the obligor.
(6) (5) The information obtained by an operator from the collection
system in accordance with this section shall retain its confidentiality
and shall only be used by the operator for the purposes of complying with
the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act. An employee or
prior employee of an operator who unlawfully discloses any such
information for any other purpose, except as otherwise specifically
authorized by law, shall be subject to the same penalties specified by
law for unauthorized disclosure of confidential information by an agent
or employee of the operator.
(7) (6) The information obtained by the Department of Health and
Human Services, the Department of Labor, or the Department of Revenue
from the operator in accordance with this section shall retain its
confidentiality and shall only be used by any one of such departments
either department in the pursuit of such department's debt or outstanding
state tax liability collection duties and practices. An employee or prior
employee of the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department
of Labor, or the Department of Revenue who unlawfully discloses any such
information for any other purpose, except as specifically authorized by
law, shall be subject to the penalties specified by law for unauthorized
disclosure of confidential information by an agent or employee of either
such department.
(7) The amount of debt and outstanding state tax liability owed
-6-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
shall be prima facie evidence of the validity of the liability.
Sec. 4. Section 9-1306, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1306 (1) Beginning on the applicable implementation date
designated by the Tax Commissioner pursuant to subsection (1) or (2) of
section 9-1312, prior to making a winnings payment and after the operator
has checked the collection system as provided in section 9-1305, the
operator shall deduct the amount of debt and outstanding state tax
liability identified in the collection system from the winnings payment
and shall remit the net winnings payment, if any, to the winner and the
amount deducted to the Department of Revenue in a manner prescribed by
the department.
(2) If an operator determines that an obligor identified using the
collection system is entitled to a winnings payment, the operator shall
notify the Department of Revenue in a manner prescribed by the department
that a balance of debt or outstanding state tax liability owed by the
winner is being remitted to the department.
(3) The Department of Revenue shall on a pro rata basis (a) first
credit any such winnings payment against any debt of such winner
certified by the Department of Health and Human Services until such debt
is satisfied, (b) next credit any such winnings payment against any debt
of such winner certified by the Department of Labor until such debt is
satisfied, and (c) lastly credit any such winnings payment then against
any outstanding state tax liability owed by such winner until such
liability is satisfied on a pro rata basis.
Sec. 5. Section 9-1307, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1307 (1) Within twenty days after a remittance pursuant to section
9-1306 due to an outstanding state tax liability, the Department of
Revenue shall notify the winner of the remittance. The notice shall state
(a) the basis for the claim to the outstanding state tax liability by the
-7-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
Department of Revenue, (b) the application of the winnings payment
against the outstanding state tax liability of the obligor, (c) the
obligor's opportunity to give written notice of intent to contest the
validity of the claim before the Department of Revenue within thirty days
after the date of the mailing of the notice, (d) the mailing address to
which the request must be sent, and (e) that a failure to contest the
claim in writing within the thirty-day period will be deemed a waiver of
the opportunity to contest the claim resulting in a setoff by default.
(2)(a) Within twenty days after notification from the Department of
Revenue of a remittance pursuant to section 9-1306 due to owing a debt
certified by the Department of Health and Human Services, the Department
of Health and Human Services shall send written notification to the
obligor of an assertion of its rights, or of the rights of an individual
not eligible as a public assistance recipient, to all or a portion of the
obligor's winnings payment.
(b) The written notification shall clearly set forth (i) the basis
for the claim to the winnings payment, (ii) the intention to apply the
winnings payment against the debt owed to a claimant, (iii) the obligor's
opportunity to give written notice of intent to contest the validity of
the claim before the Department of Health and Human Services within
thirty days after the date of the mailing of the notice, (iv) the mailing
address to which the request for a hearing must be sent, and (v) that
failure to apply for a hearing in writing within the thirty-day period
will be deemed a waiver of the opportunity to contest the claim resulting
in a setoff by default.
(3)(a) Within twenty days after notification from the Department of
Revenue of a remittance pursuant to section 9-1306 due to owing a debt
certified by the Department of Labor, the Department of Labor shall send
written notification to the obligor of an assertion of its rights to all
or a portion of the obligor's winnings payment.
(b) The written notification shall clearly set forth (i) the basis
-8-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
for the claim to the winnings payment, (ii) the intention to apply the
winnings payment against the debt owed to a claimant, (iii) the obligor's
opportunity to give written notice of intent to contest the validity of
the claim before the Department of Labor within thirty days after the
date of the mailing of the notice, (iv) the mailing address to which the
request for a hearing must be sent, and (v) that failure to apply for a
hearing in writing within the thirty-day period will be deemed a waiver
of the opportunity to contest the claim resulting in a setoff by default.
Sec. 6. Section 9-1308, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1308 (1)(a) A written request by a winner pursuant to subsection
(1) of section 9-1307 shall be effective upon mailing the request,
postage prepaid and properly addressed, to the Department of Revenue.
(b) Any appeal or action taken as a result of a decision pursuant to
subdivision (1)(a) of this section shall be in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act.
(2)(a) A written request for a hearing by a winner pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 9-1307 shall be effective upon mailing the
request, postage prepaid and properly addressed, to the Department of
Health and Human Services.
(b) If the Department of Health and Human Services receives a
written request for a hearing contesting a claim, the department shall
grant a hearing to the obligor to determine whether the claim is valid.
If the amount asserted as due and owing is not correct, an adjustment to
the claimed amount shall be made. No issues shall be reconsidered at the
hearing which have been previously litigated.
(c) Any appeal of an action taken at or as a result of a hearing
held pursuant to subdivision (2)(b) of this section shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
(3)(a) A written request for a hearing by a winner pursuant to
subsection (3) of section 9-1307 shall be effective upon mailing the
-9-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
request, postage prepaid and properly addressed, to the Department of
Labor.
(b) If the Department of Labor receives a written request for a
hearing contesting a claim, the department shall grant a hearing to the
obligor to determine whether the claim is valid. If the amount asserted
as due and owing is not correct, an adjustment to the claimed amount
shall be made. No issues shall be reconsidered at the hearing which have
been previously litigated.
(c) Any appeal of an action taken at or as a result of a hearing
held pursuant to subdivision (3)(b) of this section shall be in
accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.
Sec. 7. Section 9-1313, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
9-1313 The Department of Health and Human Services, the Department
of Labor, the Department of Revenue, and the State Racing and Gaming
Commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out
the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding Debt Act.
Sec. 8. Section 48-665, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
48-665 (1) Any person who has received any sum as benefits under the
Employment Security Law to which he or she was not entitled shall be
liable to repay such sum to the commissioner for the fund. Any such
erroneous benefit payments shall be collectible (a) without interest by
civil action in the name of the commissioner, (b) by offset against any
future benefits payable to the claimant with respect to the benefit year
current at the time of such receipt or any benefit year which may
commence within three years after the end of such current benefit year,
except that no such recoupment by the withholding of future benefits
shall be had if such sum was received by such person without fault on his
or her part and such recoupment would defeat the purpose of the
Employment Security Law or would be against equity and good conscience,
-10-

LB402 LB402
2025 2025
(c) by setoff against any state income tax refund due the claimant
pursuant to sections 77-27,197 to 77-27,209, (d) by offset against any
winnings payment pursuant to the Gambling Winnings Setoff for Outstanding
Debt Act, or (e) (d) as provided in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) The commissioner may recover a covered unemployment compensation
debt, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 6402, by setoff against a liable party's
federal income tax refund. Such setoff shall be made in accordance with
such section and United States Treasury regulations and guidelines
adopted pursuant thereto. The commissioner shall notify the debtor that
the commissioner plans to recover the debt through setoff against any
federal income tax refund, and the debtor shall be given sixty days to
present evidence that all or part of the liability is either not legally
enforceable or is not a covered unemployment compensation debt. The
commissioner shall review any evidence presented and determine that the
debt is legally enforceable and is a covered unemployment compensation
debt before proceeding further with the offset. The amount recovered,
less any administrative fees charged by the United States Treasury, shall
be credited to the debt owed. Any determination rendered under this
subsection that the liable party's federal income tax refund is not
subject to setoff does not require the commissioner to amend the
commissioner's initial determination that formed the basis for the
proposed setoff.
Sec. 9. Original section 48-665, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and sections 9-1302, 9-1303, 9-1304, 9-1306, 9-1307, 9-1308,
and 9-1313, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-